Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB859.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1732-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended to read:Section 1732-E. Department of Transportation [(Reserved)].The following shall apply to appropriations from the Motor License Fund:(1) From money appropriated to the Department of Transportation for highway and safety improvements, an amount determined by the Secretary of Transportation shall be used for the project itemized in section 339(12) of the act of July 10, 2014 (P.L.1876, No.129), known as the Highway Capital Budget Project Itemization Act of 2014-2015.(2) From money appropriated to the Department of Transportation for highway and safety improvements, an amount determined by the Secretary of Transportation shall be used for the project itemized in section 339(22) of the act of July 10, 2014 (P.L.1876, No.129), known as the Highway Capital Budget Project Itemization Act of 2014-2015.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0859PN0953 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021